Hawaii statutes.
[§414D-243] Articles of dissolution.
(a) At any time after dissolution is authorized, the corporation may dissolve
by delivering to the department director articles of dissolution setting
forth:

(1) The name of the corporation;

(2) The date dissolution was authorized;

(3) A statement that dissolution was approved by a
sufficient vote of the board;

(4) If approval of members was not required, a
statement to that effect and a statement that dissolution was approved by a
sufficient vote of the board of directors or incorporators;

(5) If approval by members was required:

(A) The designation, number of memberships
outstanding, number of votes entitled to be cast by each class entitled to vote
separately on dissolution, and number of votes of each class indisputably
voting on dissolution; and

(B) Either the total number of votes cast for
and against dissolution by each class entitled to vote separately on
dissolution or the total number of undisputed votes cast for dissolution by
each class and a statement that the number cast for dissolution by each class
was sufficient for approval by that class;

(6) If approval of dissolution by some person or
persons other than the members, the board, or the incorporators is required
pursuant to section 414D‑242(a)(3), a statement that the approval was
obtained.

(b) A corporation is dissolved upon the
effective date of its articles of dissolution. The articles of dissolution may
specify a delayed effective time and date, and if it does so, the document
becomes effective at the time and date specified. If a delayed effective date
but no time is specified, the document is effective at the close of business on
that date. A delayed effective date for a document may not be later than the
thirtieth day after the date it is filed. [L 2001, c 105, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next